Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 9 Law Enforcement Officer Training and Standards
12-9-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Auxiliary law enforcement officer” means a person who meets the minimum standards and training requirements prescribed for auxiliary law enforcement officers by law and rules, and who is appointed by a political subdivision or a law enforcement agency as a reserve officer, but does not include any law enforcement officer or deputy county sheriff employed by a planned community property owners' association;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training as established by § 12-9-103;

“Direct supervision” means having a designated on-duty, full-time certified law enforcement officer responsible for the direction, conduct, and performance of the auxiliary law enforcement officer when that auxiliary law enforcement officer is working an assigned duty, but does not mean that the full-time certified law enforcement officer must be in the physical presence of the auxiliary law enforcement officer when the auxiliary law enforcement officer is working an assigned duty;

“Honorary police officer” means any person having no law enforcement authority except as a private citizen;

“Law enforcement agency” means any police force or organization whose primary responsibility as established by statute or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state;

“Law enforcement officer” means any appointed law enforcement officer or county sheriff who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state;

“Part-time law enforcement officer” means, as applied to employment and training requirements, a law enforcement officer who works twenty-four (24) hours per week or less and receives a salary from the employing law enforcement agency; and

“Political subdivision” means any county, municipality, township, or other specific local unit of general government.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (1), substituted “auxiliary law enforcement officers” for “such officers” and “rules” for “regulations”, deleted “volunteer officer, or mounted patrol” following “reserve officer”, and inserted “law enforcement” following “but does not include any”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “a law enforcement officer who works twenty-four (24) hours per week or less and receives” for “any officer working less than twenty (20) hours per week and receiving” in (7).

Ark. L. Rev.

Thomas Christoph Keller, Comment: ABC's and AR-15's: Arming Arkansas's Teachers, 67 Ark. L. Rev. 687 (2014).

The physical presence of a supervising officer is not required at the scene of an arrest made by an auxiliary officer. McAfee v. State, 290 Ark. 446, 720 S.W.2d 307 (1986); Turnbull v. State, 22 Ark. App. 18, 731 S.W.2d 794 (1987).

Direct supervision of an auxiliary law enforcement officer can be provided by radio contact. Turnbull v. State, 22 Ark. App. 18, 731 S.W.2d 794 (1987).

Auxiliary officer was acting under the direct supervision of his supervisor even though the superior was not on duty, where both the officer and his superior were aware of each other's whereabouts at the time of an arrest, and the officer, pursuant to his superior's instructions, phoned the superior from the police station and received further instructions from the superior as to how he should proceed in handling the situation. Martindill v. State, 40 Ark. App. 16, 839 S.W.2d 545 (1992).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1401; Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 16; 2019, No. 151, § 3.

12-9-302. Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training — Powers and duties.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training in §§12-9-104 —12-9-107, the commission shall have power to:

Promulgate rules for the administration of this subchapter;

Require the submission of reports and information by law enforcement agencies within this state;

Establish minimum selection and training standards for admission to appointment as an auxiliary law enforcement officer. The standards may take into account different requirements for urban and rural areas.

However, the minimum selection and training standards for admission to appointment may not exceed those required for part-time law enforcement officers;

Establish minimum curriculum requirements for preparatory, in-service, and advanced courses and programs of schools operated by and for the training of auxiliary law enforcement officers;

Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of this state, other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, junior colleges, community colleges, and other institutions or organizations concerning the development of police training schools and programs or courses of instruction;

Approve institutions and facilities to be used by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training law enforcement officers and recruits;

Exclude auxiliary law enforcement officers from the full-time basic training classes sponsored and supported by the commission;

Adopt rules and minimum standards for such schools which shall include, but not be limited to, establishing minimum:

Basic training requirements which an auxiliary law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete before being eligible for appointment;

Course attendance and equipment requirements; and

Requirements for instructors;

Conduct review of agency records to assist any department head in complying with the provisions of this subchapter;

Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management and control; and

Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (7), inserted “the full-time basic” and substituted “commission” for “Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1402; Acts 2017, No. 497, § 17; 2019, No. 315, § 854.

12-9-303. Authority of officers.

An auxiliary law enforcement officer shall have the authority of a police officer as set forth by statutes of this state when the auxiliary law enforcement officer is performing an assigned duty and is under the direct supervision of a full-time certified law enforcement officer.

When not performing an assigned duty and when not working under the direct supervision of a full-time certified law enforcement officer, an auxiliary law enforcement officer shall have no authority other than that of a private citizen.

An auxiliary law enforcement officer, when not working under the direct supervision of a full-time certified law enforcement officer, may perform tasks such as traffic direction, parade functions, etc., that are clearly not law enforcement functions and are assigned by the law enforcement agency.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as defining an auxiliary law enforcement officer as a full-time certified law enforcement officer, a part-time certified law enforcement officer, or a specialized certified officer as defined by §§ 12-9-101, 12-9-102, 12-9-104 — 12-9-109, and the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

Ark. L. Rev.

Thomas Christoph Keller, Comment: ABC's and AR-15's: Arming Arkansas's Teachers, 67 Ark. L. Rev. 687 (2014).

The physical presence of a supervising officer is not required at the scene of an arrest made by an auxiliary officer. McAfee v. State, 290 Ark. 446, 720 S.W.2d 307 (1986); Turnbull v. State, 22 Ark. App. 18, 731 S.W.2d 794 (1987).

The presence of a second officer, who was a full-time, certified officer, did not make the arrest by the auxiliary law enforcement officer lawful. McAfee v. State, 290 Ark. 446, 720 S.W.2d 307 (1986).

To require that the designated supervising officer be speaking to the auxiliary officer during the arrest process would constitute an unreasonable interpretation of subsection (a) of this section. McAfee v. State, 290 Ark. 446, 720 S.W.2d 307 (1986).

Auxiliary officer was acting under the direct supervision of his supervisor even though the superior was not on duty, where both the officer and his superior were aware of each other's whereabouts at the time of the arrest, and the officer phoned the superior from the police station and received further instructions from the superior as to how he should proceed in handling the situation. Martindill v. State, 40 Ark. App. 16, 839 S.W.2d 545 (1992).

Neither subsection (a) nor (b) contains language that requires that the auxiliary officer be “on duty” before he or she could be authorized and activated to perform law enforcement functions. Martin v. State, 327 Ark. 38, 936 S.W.2d 75 (1997).

Where defendant was arrested and issued citation for a misdemeanor by two unsupervised auxiliary deputies, defendant could not be tried or convicted of the offense because unsupervised auxiliary deputies lacked authority to lawfully charge defendant with a misdemeanor offense. Brewer v. State, 286 Ark. 1, 688 S.W.2d 736 (1985).

Cited: King v. State, 304 Ark. 592, 804 S.W.2d 360 (1991); Jones v. Parrish, 330 Ark. 521, 954 S.W.2d 934 (1997).

The commission may issue a certificate evidencing satisfactory completion of the requirements of this subchapter when evidence is submitted by the law enforcement agency director, chief, or county sheriff that the auxiliary law enforcement officer has met the training and selection requirements.

The appointing law enforcement agency shall provide not less than one hundred ten (110) hours of commission-approved law enforcement training, which shall include a firearms qualification course equivalent to the firearms qualification requirements for a full-time law enforcement officer, and an auxiliary law enforcement officer shall not bear a firearm until having successfully completed the commission-approved law enforcement training.

An auxiliary law enforcement officer is not required to requalify for firearms qualification beyond what a full-time law enforcement officer is required to complete for requalification for the purposes of carrying a concealed handgun while the auxiliary law enforcement officer remains appointed as an auxiliary law enforcement officer.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude any law enforcement agency from establishing qualifications and standards for appointing and training of auxiliary law enforcement officers that exceed those set by this subchapter or by the commission.

Any auxiliary law enforcement officer failing to meet the training requirements as set forth in this subchapter shall lose his or her appointment as auxiliary law enforcement officer and shall not be reappointed until training requirements have been met.

No person may be appointed or serve as an auxiliary law enforcement officer if the person has been convicted by a state or by the federal government of a crime, the punishment for which could have been imprisonment in a federal penitentiary or a state prison.

Every person appointed or serving as an auxiliary law enforcement officer shall be a citizen of the United States and shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 497, in (f) [now (f)(1)], substituted “The appointing law enforcement agency shall provide” for “It shall be the responsibility of the appointing law enforcement agency to provide or have provided”, substituted “one hundred ten (110)” for “one hundred (100)”, inserted “commission-approved law enforcement” preceding the last occurrence of “training”, and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by No. 957 redesignated former (f) as (f)(1) and added (f)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “A person shall not function” for “No person shall be appointed” in (a)(1); and, in (a)(2), substituted “An” for “Any” and “the minimum standards for appointment and training” for “these”.

Where defendant was arrested and issued a citation for a misdemeanor by two unsupervised auxiliary deputies, defendant could not be tried or convicted of the offense because unsupervised auxiliary deputies lacked authority to lawfully charge defendant with a misdemeanor offense. Brewer v. State, 286 Ark. 1, 688 S.W.2d 736 (1985).

Cited: Pipes v. State, 22 Ark. App. 235, 738 S.W.2d 423 (1987).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the introductory language of (a)(1); in (a)(1)(A), substituted “Two (2)“ for “One (1)” and substituted“officers” for “officer”; and added (c).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted the former first sentence, substituted “A political” for “Further, the political”, and substituted “appoint auxiliary” for “appoint more auxiliary”; inserted “under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section” in (a)(2)(B) and (C); and made stylistic changes.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted former (b) and redesignated former (c) and (d) as present (b) and (c).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1405.

12-9-304. Appointment and training requirements.

(1)A person shall not function as an auxiliary law enforcement officer until the minimum standards for appointment and training requirements have been completed.

An auxiliary law enforcement officer who has not met the minimum standards for appointment and training requirements shall have no law enforcement authority except that which is authorized for a private citizen.

All persons who are serving as auxiliary law enforcement officers prior to March 24, 1983, are exempt from meeting the appointment requirements.

The training requirements for auxiliary law enforcement officers shall be established by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, and the basic training course shall not exceed the part-time law enforcement officers' training requirements.

Honorary police officers are exempt from the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1404; Acts 2017, No. 497, § 18; 2017, No. 957, § 3; 2019, No. 151, § 4.

12-9-305. Failure to meet standards — Actions by private citizens.

An auxiliary law enforcement officer who does not meet the standards and qualifications set forth in this subchapter or any made by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall not take any official action as a law enforcement officer and any action taken shall be held as invalid.

(1)Nothing in this subchapter or any requirement made by the commission shall prevent any action by a private citizen that is now authorized by law.

No provision of this subchapter shall affect the deputizing of a private citizen by a law enforcement officer in a time of a disaster or emergency.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1403.

12-9-306. Number restricted.

(1)A political subdivision may appoint auxiliary law enforcement officers equal to the larger number of:

Two (2) auxiliary law enforcement officers for each full-time certified law enforcement officer employed by the appointing law enforcement agency; or

One (1) auxiliary law enforcement officer for each one thousand (1,000) persons in the political subdivision as determined by the latest official census.

(A)However, if due to special or unusual problems or circumstances, any political subdivision has a need for a greater number of auxiliary law enforcement officers than is authorized in subdivision (a)(1)(A) or subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, the political subdivision may make a request to the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training for the additional auxiliary law enforcement officers.

Each request under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall state the special or unusual problems involved which justify the request, the number of additional auxiliary law enforcement officers requested, and such other information as the commission may require.

If the commission finds that the public interest will best be served by allowing the political subdivision to appoint the additional auxiliary law enforcement officers requested, the commission may grant the request under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.

Honorary police officers without law enforcement authority are not restricted in number by this section.

The limitation concerning the number of auxiliary law enforcement officers allowed to be appointed by a law enforcement agency under this section does not apply to additional auxiliary law enforcement officers appointed by political subdivisions to serve as school resource officers or search and rescue officers.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1406; Acts 2013, No. 705, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 19.

12-9-307. Benefits.

The auxiliary law enforcement officer or the governing political subdivision may elect to join the workers' compensation system for the benefit of the auxiliary law enforcement officer, and the auxiliary law enforcement officer may receive benefits therefrom as provided by statutes.

The political subdivision may elect to provide liability insurance, uniforms, and such other equipment as may be necessary to perform the assigned tasks, and these provisions shall not be considered as salary or wages.

An auxiliary law enforcement officer may receive such compensation, per diem, expenses, or other allowances for his or her services, for such purposes as transporting juveniles, as may be agreed to by the appointing authority.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1407; Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 2; 2019, No. 151, § 5.

12-9-308. Liability of law enforcement agency and political subdivision.

The law enforcement agency director, chief, or county sheriff and the political subdivision appointing the auxiliary law enforcement officer shall not be held either civilly or criminally liable or in any other manner for the actions of an auxiliary law enforcement officer.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 757, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1408; Acts 1987, No. 275, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Radar Instructors and Operators

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 672, § 7: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that no required minimum standards for training and certification of police traffic radar instructors or operators exists, and that properly trained and certified police officers are important to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state. There is no statutory authority to regulate the use of police traffic radar for law enforcement purposes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the protection of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 115, § 3: Feb. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 672 of 1983 empowered the Governor's Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training to establish minimum standards for radar instructors and operators; that the act's definition of police traffic radar has resulted in adverse rulings against the state by our courts; that this act redefines the term in a manner that will better enable the commission to implement the act; and that this act is immediately necessary to cure the defective definition. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

12-9-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Full-time law enforcement officer” means any county sheriff, or any other law enforcement officer employed by a law enforcement agency who works more than twenty-four (24) hours per week and receives a salary from the law enforcement agency;

“Law enforcement agency” means any police force or organization whose primary responsibility as established by statute or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state;

“Law enforcement officer” means any appointed law enforcement officer or county sheriff who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state;

“Part-time law enforcement officer” means a law enforcement officer who works twenty-four (24) hours per week or less and receives a salary from the employing law enforcement agency;

“Police traffic radar” means any speed measurement device utilizing the Doppler principle or an infrared light system to measure the speed of motor vehicles; and

“Political subdivision” means any county, municipality, township, or other specific local unit of general government.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (2), substituted “and receives a salary from the law enforcement agency” for “or any part-time law enforcement officer employed by a law enforcement agency who has met the selection and training requirements for full-time certified officers”.

The 2019 amendment deleted former (1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in (1), inserted “any other law enforcement”, and substituted “more than twenty-four (24) hours” for “forty (40) or more hours”; and, in (4), substituted “a law enforcement officer who works twenty-four (24) hours per week or less and receives” for “any officer working less than twenty (20) hours per week and receiving”.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 672, § 1; 1985, No. 115, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1010; Acts 1991, No. 374, § 1; 1993, No. 63, § 1; 1997, No. 1105, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 20; 2019, No. 151, § 6.

12-9-402. Powers and duties of the commission.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training in §§12-9-104 —12-9-107, the commission shall have power to:

Promulgate rules for the administration of this subchapter;

Require the submission of reports and information by law enforcement agencies within this state;

Establish minimum selection and training standards for appointment as a police traffic radar operator and police traffic radar instructor. The standards may take into account different requirements for urban and rural areas;

Establish minimum curriculum requirements for the basic radar operator's course, the basic radar instructor's course, and the refresher courses for the radar operators and the radar instructors;

Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of this state, other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, junior colleges, community colleges, and other institutions or organizations concerning the development of police traffic radar training schools and programs or courses of instruction;

Approve institutions and facilities to be used by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training radar operators and radar instructors;

Exclude honorary law enforcement officers from training classes sponsored and supported by the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy for the training of radar operators and radar instructors;

Adopt rules and minimum standards for such schools and courses which shall include, but not be limited to, establishing minimum:

Basic training requirements which police radar operators and police radar instructors are required to satisfactorily complete before being eligible for radar certification;

Course attendance and equipment requirements; and

Requirements for instructors;

Conduct review of agency records to assist any department head in complying with the provisions of this subchapter;

Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management and control; and

Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “auxiliary law enforcement officers” following “Exclude” in (7).

The 2017 amendment deleted “part-time law enforcement officers and” following “Exclude” in (7); and, in (8)(A), deleted “and refresher” following “Basic” and substituted “are required to” for “must”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 672, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1011; Acts 2011, No. 1240, § 2; 2017, No. 497, § 21; 2019, No. 315, § 855.

12-9-403. Appointment and training.

A person shall not be appointed as a police traffic radar operator or police traffic radar instructor until the minimum standards for training requirements have been completed.

The training requirements for police traffic radar operators or police traffic radar instructors shall be established by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

The commission shall issue a certificate evidencing a law enforcement officer's certification to operate a police traffic radar after evidence is submitted by the law enforcement agency director, chief, or county sheriff that the police traffic radar operator has met the training requirements.

This section does not preclude any law enforcement agency from establishing qualifications and standards for appointing and training of police traffic radar operators and police traffic radar instructors that exceed those set by this subchapter or by the commission.

A police traffic radar operator or police traffic radar instructor failing to meet the training requirements as set forth in this subchapter shall lose his or her authority to operate a police traffic radar for enforcement purposes.

A law enforcement officer shall complete the commission-required training for law enforcement officer certification before being eligible for certification as a police traffic radar operator.

Only a full-time law enforcement officer, part-time law enforcement officer, or an auxiliary law enforcement officer appointed as a reserve law enforcement officer as defined by commission rule is eligible for certification as a police traffic radar operator.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “commission” in present (b); and substituted “shall complete” for “must have completed” in present (f).

The 2011 amendment, in (g), inserted “or an auxiliary law enforcement officer appointed as a reserve law enforcement officer” and substituted “rule is” for “regulation, will be”.

The 2019 amendment in (c), substituted “shall” for “may” and “a law enforcement officer’s certification to operate a police traffic radar after” for “satisfactory completion of the requirements of this subchapter when”; substituted “This section does not” for “Nothing in this section shall be construed to” in (d); inserted the second occurrence of “law enforcement” in (f); substituted “part-time law enforcement officer” for “part-time I law enforcement officer, part-time II law enforcement officer” in (g); and made stylistic changes.

Cited: Price v. State, 285 Ark. 148, 685 S.W.2d 506 (1985).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 672, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1013; Acts 1997, No. 734, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 28; 2011, No. 1240, § 3; 2019, No. 151, § 7.

12-9-404. Failure to meet standards.

A police traffic radar operator who does not meet the standards and qualifications set forth in this subchapter or any made by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall not take any official action as a police traffic radar operator and any action taken shall be held as invalid.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 672, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1012.

Subchapter 5

— Management Training and Education

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 7, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall be construed to develop or provide basic skills mandated training presently carried out by Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 11: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that heads of law enforcement organizations are finding it increasingly difficult to maintain their expertise in new and innovative management techniques and technologies related to law enforcement management and administrative and operational areas. It is imperative that the leaders and management staff of law enforcement receive continuing education to enhance and improve their level of expertise and maintain professionalism. Funds for this type of education are not available from other sources. Therefore in order to meet this need, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 12: Aug. 25, 1994. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Second Extraordinary Session, that the passage of this Act is of critical importance in the provision of needed resources to overcome severe public information and service deficiencies in such areas as criminal justice instruction, crime intervention services, and research activities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1035, § 8: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1997, is essential to the efficient transfer of the Criminal Justice Institute to the University of Arkansas as a division thereof, and that in the event of the extension of the Regular Session, any delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration of the Criminal Justice Institute and provision of its services to Arkansas law enforcement and national law enforcement. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

12-9-501. Legislative determination.

The Criminal Justice Institute, an educational entity, was created for the purpose of providing management education and training, technical assistance, practical research and evaluation, a clearinghouse, and computer and forensic education and training for Arkansas law enforcement and national law enforcement.

The initiatives developed by the Criminal Justice Institute are applicable on a national level, and this application for conceptualization and practice will be through the National Center for Rural Law Enforcement.

The General Assembly recognizes the importance of providing management, education, and training to law enforcement and, through the initiatives developed by the Criminal Justice Institute, the citizens of the State of Arkansas will be better served.

These initiatives further the enhancement of the workforce through the developmental process of continuing education by which skills are upgraded and capabilities increased.

This process will assist law enforcement ability to adapt to an ever-changing environment.

The General Assembly further recognizes that:

Law enforcement plays a significant role in preventing and responding to acts of violence, terrorism, and natural disasters that occur on public school campuses; and

Matters of public school campus safety require specialized education and training for law enforcement officers, school resource officers, and other school personnel who respond to incidents on school campuses:

To develop and maintain strong partnerships between school personnel and law enforcement in preventing and responding to acts of violence, terrorism, and natural disaster that occur on public school campuses; and

For law enforcement officers to operate effectively in a school setting.

Initiatives of the Criminal Justice Institute for specialized education and training on public school campus safety will enhance citizen cooperation and understanding of law enforcement in these areas and other issues of crime and violence against school children.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 484, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Crime and violence remain issues in Arkansas public schools and nationwide;

“(2)The citizens of Arkansas have twice experienced the tragedy of a school shooting:

“(A)In 1997 when two (2) Stamps High School students were shot and wounded by sniper fire from a fellow student; and

“(B)In 1998 when four (4) students and one (1) teacher were killed at Westside Middle School in Jonesboro and nine (9) more students and one (1) teacher were wounded;

“(3) In 2007, the National Center for Education Statistics reported that an average of nine and one-tenths percent (9.1%) of Arkansas's public high school students had been threatened or injured with a weapon on school property, compared to the national average of seven and eight-tenths percent (7.8%); and

“(4)With the increasing levels of crime and violence in our schools, school administrators and personnel must be prepared for more than the academic challenges of teaching students. They must also:

“(A)Develop and maintain a strong partnership with law enforcement; and

“(B)Be trained to recognize and assume their roles and responsibilities for preventing and responding to acts of violence, terrorism, natural disaster, and other crimes impacting the school environment.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (d).

The president shall seek the advice and counsel of the Criminal Justice Institute Advisory Board for Law Enforcement Management Training and Education in the appointment of the director.

In the administration of the institute, efforts shall be made to maintain personnel salary levels at a competitive level to permit recruitment of the best qualified candidates.

There is established the Criminal Justice Institute Advisory Board for Law Enforcement Management Training and Education.

(1)The board shall have sixteen (16) members.

Two (2) representatives from the Arkansas Municipal Police Association;

Two (2) representatives from the Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;

Two (2) representatives from the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association; and

Two (2) faculty members or administrators from institutions of higher education.

The eight (8) members of the board in subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) of this section shall be appointed by the Governor.

Terms of the eight (8) members appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section shall be four (4) years in length.

Other members of the board shall be:

The Special Agent in Charge of the Arkansas office of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or his or her designee;

The President of the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;

The President of the Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Municipal Police Association;

The Director of the Criminal Justice Institute;

The Director of Legislative and Governmental Affairs of the Arkansas State Police Association;

A citizen at large nominated by the Director of the Criminal Justice Institute; and

The President of the University of Arkansas or his or her designee.

Terms of the members serving pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section shall be five (5) years in length, and the terms shall be staggered so that, insofar as is possible, an equal number of members shall rotate each year.

However, the term of a member who serves by virtue of the office he or she holds shall run so long as the member holds the office.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As originally enacted by Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 2, subdivision (a)(2) of this section ended “effective July 1, 1993.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 2, provided, in part, terms of the members of the Criminal Justice Institute Advisory Board for Law Enforcement Management Training and Education would be 4 years with an initial drawing of lots establishing the staggering of terms.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (b); redesignated former (a)(2) and (a)(3) as present (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “members appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii)” for “association and institution representatives” in present (b)(2)(A)(iii); in present (b)(2)(C)(i), deleted “of office” following “Terms” and inserted “serving pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(B)”; and made minor punctuation changes.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 1; 1997, No. 1035, § 1; 2013, No. 484, § 4.

12-9-502. Administration and approval.

(1)The Criminal Justice Institute of the University of Arkansas at Little Rock has served as the coordinator and manager of all supervision, management, and executive education and training for law enforcement officers in the State of Arkansas.

Effective July 1, 1997, to accomplish its broader scope and mission, the institute and its functions, budget, personnel, equipment, all funds, and existing contracts and agreements, including those made at the behest of the institute, shall be transferred in their entirety from the University of Arkansas at Little Rock to the University of Arkansas to better serve the citizens of the State of Arkansas.

(1)(A)In its association with the University of Arkansas as a division thereof, the Director of the Criminal Justice Institute shall be appointed by and report to the President of the University of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 3; 1997, No. 1035, § 2.

12-9-503. Criminal Justice Institute Advisory Board.

(A)(i)The board shall consist of the following representatives:

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 2; 1997, No. 1035, § 3; 2005, No. 1962, § 29.

12-9-504. Evaluation.

In order to ensure quality control, provide for efficient use of available resources, and minimize duplication of effort, the Criminal Justice Institute shall be the clearinghouse to determine the qualifications of instructors, both academic and practitioner, and to certify all programs of instruction pursuant to this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 4.

12-9-505. Certification and accreditation program.

The Criminal Justice Institute shall develop a certification and accreditation program for all law enforcement supervisors, managers, and heads of police departments and law enforcement agencies.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 5.

12-9-506. Compensation.

In order to ensure the best available training, education, and programs, the Criminal Justice Institute is authorized to pay honoraria to state, county, and municipal employees upon approval of their supervisors and within their line item salary maximum limits.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1111, § 6.

12-9-507. Staffing procedure.

The Criminal Justice Institute shall submit to the Joint Budget Committee a yearly report reflecting hiring and participation.

History.

Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 5; 1997, No. 1035, § 4.